North Dakota statutes. TITLE 58 Townships
CHAPTER 58-17 Township Parks

58-17-01.
Townships — Authority to acquire, operate, and regulate parks.

Any township may acquire, establish, construct, expand, own, lease, control, equip, improve, maintain, operate, regulate, and police any park either within or without the geographic limits of such township and may use for such purposes any available property owned or controlled or occupied for the purpose or purposes enumerated in this chapter. Any such park must be declared to be acquired, owned, leased, controlled, or occupied for a public purpose in accordance with public need.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 540, § 1.

58-17-02.
Townships — Parks — Funding for park purposes.

In townships supporting parks, funding may be provided from revenues derived from the general fund levy authority of the township for park purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 540, § 2; 1983, ch. 593, § 83; 1983, ch. 606, § 102; 2015, ch. 439, § 100, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

58-17-03.
Townships — Parks — Tax levy may be certified by board of supervisors.

The board of township supervisors may certify annually to the county auditor the amount of tax to be levied by such township for park purposes in the same manner as provided by law for other township levies. The proceeds of such taxes must be deposited in a special fund or account into which other park revenues of the township are deposited and may be expended by the township only for park purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 540, § 3.